Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0274.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 111. The portion of highway US-131 in Kalamazoo County between highway I-94 and Parkview Avenue shall be known as the Master Sergeant Gregory T. Kuhse Memorial Highway. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor